Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 4. Housing Discrimination; Domestic and Sexual Violence

§ 4471.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Abuse” has the same meaning as in

15 V.S.A. § 1101

.

“Protected tenant” means a tenant who is:

a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking;

a parent, foster parent, legal guardian, or caretaker with at least partial physical custody of a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.

“Sexual assault” and “stalking” have the same meaning as in

12 V.S.A. § 5131

.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 48

, § 2.

§ 4472.
Right to terminate rental agreement.

Notwithstanding a contrary provision of a rental agreement or of subchapter 2 of this chapter, a protected tenant may terminate a rental agreement pursuant to subsection (b) of this section without penalty or liability if he or she reasonably believes it is necessary to vacate a dwelling unit:

based on a fear of imminent harm to any protected tenant due to abuse, sexual assault, or stalking; or

if any protected tenant was a victim of sexual assault that occurred on the premises within the six months preceding the date of his or her notice of termination.

Not less than 30 days before the date of termination, the protected tenant shall provide to the landlord:

a written notice of termination; and

documentation from one or more of the following sources supporting his or her reasonable belief that it is necessary to vacate the dwelling unit:

a court, law enforcement, or other government agency;

an abuse, sexual assault, or stalking assistance program;

a legal, clerical, medical, or other professional from whom the tenant, or the minor or dependent of the tenant, received counseling or other assistance concerning abuse, sexual assault, or stalking; or

a self-certification of a protected tenant’s status as a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking, signed under penalty of perjury, on a standard form adopted for that purpose by:

a federal or State government entity, including the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or the Vermont Department for Children and Families; or

a nonprofit organization that provides support services to protected tenants.

A notice of termination provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may be revoked and the rental agreement shall remain in effect if:

the protected tenant provides a written notice to the landlord revoking the notice of termination; and
(1) (A) the protected tenant provides a written notice to the landlord revoking the notice of termination; and

the landlord has not entered into a rental agreement with another tenant prior to the date of the revocation; or

the protected tenant has not vacated the premises as of the date of termination; and
(2) (A) the protected tenant has not vacated the premises as of the date of termination; and

the landlord has not entered into a rental agreement with another tenant prior to the date of termination.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 48

, § 2.

§ 4473.
Right to change locks; other security measures.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of a rental agreement or of subchapter 2 of this chapter:

Subject to subdivision (2) of this subsection, a protected tenant may request that a landlord change the locks of a dwelling unit within 48 hours following the request:

based on a fear of imminent harm to any protected tenant due to abuse, sexual assault, or stalking; or

if any protected tenant was a victim of sexual assault that occurred on the premises within the six months preceding the date of his or her request.

If the perpetrator of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking is also a tenant in the dwelling unit, the protected tenant shall include with his or her request a copy of a court order that requires the perpetrator to leave the premises.

If the landlord changes the locks as requested, the landlord shall provide a key to the new locks to each tenant of the dwelling unit, not including the perpetrator of the abuse, sexual assault, or stalking who is subject to a court order to leave the premises.

If the landlord does not change the locks as requested, the protected tenant may change the locks without the landlord’s prior knowledge or permission, provided that the protected tenant shall:

ensure that the new locks, and the quality of the installation, equal or exceed the quality of the original;

notify the landlord of the change within 24 hours of installation; and

provide the landlord with a key to the new locks.

Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, a protected tenant is responsible for the costs of installation of new locks pursuant to this section.

A protected tenant may request permission of a landlord to install additional security measures on the premises, including a security system or security camera.
(6) (A) A protected tenant may request permission of a landlord to install additional security measures on the premises, including a security system or security camera.

A protected tenant:

shall submit his or her request not less than seven days prior to installation;

shall ensure the quality and safety of the security measures and of their installation;

is responsible for the costs of installation and operation of the security measures; and

is liable for damages resulting from installation.

A landlord shall not unreasonably refuse a protected tenant’s request to install additional security measures pursuant to this subdivision (6).

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 48

, § 2.

§ 4474.
Confidentiality.

An owner, landlord, or housing subsidy provider who possesses documentation or information concerning a protected tenant’s status as a victim of abuse, sexual assault, or stalking shall keep the documentation or information confidential and shall not allow or provide access to another person unless:

authorized by the protected tenant;

required by a court order, government regulation, or governmental audit requirement; or

required as evidence in a court proceeding, provided:

the documentation or information remains under seal; and

use of the documentation or information is limited to a claim brought pursuant to section 4472 or 4473 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 48

, § 2.

§ 4475.
Limitation of liability; enforcement.

Except in the case of gross negligence or willful misconduct, a landlord is immune from liability for damages to a protected tenant if he or she acts in good faith reliance on:

the provisions of this subchapter; or

information provided or action taken by a protected tenant pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 48

, § 2.